Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 26 Swine, Goats or Elk Running at Large

Cross references. —

As to owner's claims for diseased animals slaughtered by state veterinarian with reference to foot and mouth disease among sheep and swine, see §

11-19-106

.

As to estrays generally, see §§

11-24-101

to

11-24-115

.

As to feeding untreated garbage to swine, see §§

11-27-101

to

11-27-107

.

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to powers of cities and towns relative to animals running at large, see title 15.

As to livestock roaming at large in Hot Springs state park, see §

36-8-316

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 48 to 70.

Contributory negligence as a defense to a cause of action based upon violation of statute imposing duty upon keeper of animals, 10 ALR2d 853.

Constitutionality of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of abandoned animals, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Constitutionality of statute permitting the destruction of hogs running at large on or near public levees, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Liability for injury to vehicle or person riding therein by animal at large in street or highway, 59 ALR2d 1328.

Injunction to restrain repeated or continuing trespasses by livestock and fowls, 60 ALR2d 310.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, of livestock or fowl on highway, 55 ALR4th 822.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 137 to 169.

§ 11-26-101.
Prohibited generally; liability of owner; penalty.

It is unlawful for the owner of any swine, goats, domestic elk or exotic livestock to allow such animals to run at large within Wyoming. As used in this section, “exotic livestock” means any nontraditional livestock animal including, without limitation, llama, alpaca and other camelids, ostrich and other ratites, bison hybrids and yaks. Any owner who permits or causes such animals to run at large within Wyoming, is liable for damages incurred by any person by reason thereof in a civil action.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section, after twenty-four (24) hours written notice by a proper officer, shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 127, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1887, §§ 4160, 4161; R.S. 1899, §§ 2055, 2056; C.S. 1910, §§ 2663, 2664; Laws 1915, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, §§ 3173, 3174; R.S. 1931, §§ 67-1601, 67-1602; Laws 1935, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-1901, 56-1902; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-517, 11-518; W.S. 1977, §§

11-31-101

,

11-31-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted the comma for “or” following “swine, goats”, added “or exotic livestock” after “domestic elk”, and added the second sentence in (a); and substituted “punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

” for “ fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) or more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for each offense” in (b).

Section in no way authorizes ownership of domestic elk

but instead merely provides a penalty for any owner who allows them to run at large. State ex rel. Wyo. Game & Fish Comm'n v. Fordyce, 503 P.2d 1198,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1972).